Utah statutes.
63C-7-306.   Publication of notice, resolution, or other proceeding -- Period for contesting.

(1)  The executive committee of the Utah Communications Agency Network may provide for the publication of any resolution or other proceedings adopted under this chapter:

(a)  in a newspaper of general circulation within the state; and

(b)  as required in Section 45-1-101.

(2)  In case of a resolution or other proceeding providing for the issuance of bonds, the executive committee may, in lieu of publishing the entire resolution or other proceeding, publish a notice of bonds to be issued containing:

(a)  the name of the issuer;

(b)  the purpose of the issue;

(c)  the type of bonds and the maximum principal amount which may be issued;

(d)  the maximum number of years over which the bonds may mature;

(e)  the maximum interest rate which the bonds may bear, if any;

(f)  the maximum discount from par, expressed as a percentage of principal amount, at which the bonds may be sold; and

(g)  the times and place where a copy of the resolution or other proceeding may be examined, which shall be at the principal office of the Utah Communications Agency Network during regular business hours and for a period of at least 30 days after the publication of the notice.

(3)  For a period of 30 days after the publication, any person in interest may contest the legality of the resolution or proceeding, any bonds which may be authorized by the resolution or proceeding, or any provision made for the security and payment of the bonds by filing a pleading with the district court for the city in which the Utah Communications Network maintains its principal office.

